Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-909
Violation; penalty.

Any person or partner, limited liability company member, officer, or agent of any person who knowingly and intentionally violates any of the provisions of the Grain Dealer Act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony and, in addition, shall be liable for any damages suffered as a result of such violation.

Laws 1985, LB 389, § 11;

Laws 1987, LB 507, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 35, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 475;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 88.